Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Chapter 26 Electrologists Practice Act
63-26-127. Penalties — Disposition of fines.

Any person who practices electrology without a license commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Each violation of this chapter constitutes a separate offense.

All civil penalties for a violation of this chapter shall be paid to the commissioner and given to the state treasurer as provided in § 63-26-107.

Acts 1988, ch. 896, § 29; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1993, ch. 342, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-34-227; Acts 2009, ch. 456, §§ 35, 40.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 456, § 41 provided that all rules and regulations filed by the board of electrolysis in the office of secretary of state on June 23, 2009, shall be deemed to be rules and regulations of the commissioner of health. The secretary of state is authorized and directed to change any references to the board of electrolysis to references to the commissioner of health in rules and regulations promulgated by the board of electrolysis pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. The rules and regulations of the board of electrolysis that were properly promulgated pursuant to title 4, chapter 5 shall remain in effect until subsequently amended or repealed.

Cross-References. Funds, deposits and disbursements, § 63-1-137.

License and registration fees, § 63-1-112.

Penalties, § 63-1-123.

Penalties for violation of statute, rule or order, § 63-1-134.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

63-26-105. [Reserved.]